src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V-nähä_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:ä%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! oon
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:ä%>%^WCnst	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:k%>%^LCnsOÖ1%>V1	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:ä%>%^WCnsmmAÄ1	#   ; !näämmä
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:ä%>%^WCnsttAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:k%>%^LCnsOÖ1%>V1t	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:h%>%^LCnsAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>V1	#   ;

:ki IndPrt ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>%^WCnsin       #   ; ! oon
!+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>%^WCnsit       #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg3:ki        K_V   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>%^WCnsimmAÄ1     #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>%^WCnsittAÄ1     #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:ki%>vAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+Ind+Prt+4:%>htii     #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:t         #   ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+4:h%>%^WCnstUY1         A-kova   ;

:hn PotPers ;
!+Pot+4:ollaa      #   ;
!+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

:k CondPers ;
! +Cond+Sg1:olisin      #   ; ! oon
! +Cond+Sg2:olisit      #   ;
! +Cond+Sg3:olis      #   ;
! +Cond+Pl1:olisimma    #   ;
! +Cond+Pl2:olisitta    #   ;
! +Cond+Pl3:olisivat     #   ;
! +Cond+4:oltais      #   ;
! !+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:h ImprtPers_k ;
! +Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
+Imprt+4:htAÄ1kOÖ1OÖ1     K_V   ;
! !+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:ki V-actor_jA ; !
:kö V-ActPrsPrc ; ! näkövä
! +Prc:olt			       #   ; !V-ActPrtPrc_nt !?nähnt
+PrsPrc:htAÄ1vAÄ1	A-tulova   ;
! +Prc:oltu			       #   ;
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:kömAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! näkömätöin
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:kemAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! näkömätöin
! 
+Inf:h%>%^WCnsAÄ1             #   ; ! nähä
+Inf:kömAÄ1  SG-ILL_V  ; ! kirjuttamaa
+Inf:kemAÄ1  SG-ILL_V  ; ! kirjuttamaa
+Inf:kömAÄ1  SG-INE   ;
+Inf:kemAÄ1  SG-INE   ;
+Inf:kömAÄ1  SG-ELA   ;
+Inf:kemAÄ1  SG-ELA   ;
+Inf:kömAÄ1  SG-ABE   ;
+Inf:kemAÄ1  SG-ABE   ;
+Ger+Ine:hhees		#   ;
+Der/miin:kömi N-inmihiin ; 
+Der/miin:kemi N-inmihiin ; 

! panna:pa
LEXICON V-panna
+V: V-panna_01 ;

LEXICON V-panna_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:AÄ1%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! oon
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:AÄ1%>%^WCnst	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:nOÖ1%>%^LVws	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:AÄ1mmAÄ1	K   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:AÄ1ttAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:nOÖ1%>%^LVwst	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:ntAÄ1%>%^WCnsAÄ1	K   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:AÄ1%>%^WCns	#   ;

:ni IndPrt ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg1:n%>%^WCnsin       #   ; ! oon
!+Ind+Prt+Sg2:n%>%^WCnsit       #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg3:ni        K_V   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl1:n%>%^WCnsimmAÄ1     #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl2:n%>%^WCnsittAÄ1     #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:nivAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+Ind+Prt+4:n%>tii     #   ;
!+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:o%>%^WCnsttUY1         A-kova   ;
!
:nn PotPers ; ! pannoo
!!+V+Pot+4:ollaa      #   ;
!!+V+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
!
!! +V+Cond+Sg1:olisin      #   ; ! oon
!! +V+Cond+Sg2:olisit      #   ;
!! +V+Cond+Sg3:olis      #   ;
!! +V+Cond+Pl1:olisimma    #   ;
!! +V+Cond+Pl2:olisitta    #   ;
!! +V+Cond+Pl3:olisivat     #   ;
!! +V+Cond+4:oltais      #   ;
!! !+V+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:n ImprtPers_k ;
!! +V+Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
+Imprt+4:ntAÄ1kOÖ1OÖ1    K_V   ;
!! !+V+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:ni V-actor_jA ; !
:no V-ActPrsPrc ; ! panova
 V-ActPrtPrc_nt ; !pant
+Prc:ntAÄ1vAÄ1		A-tulova   ;
+PrtPrc:n%>tUY1		A-kova   ;
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:nOÖ1mAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! panomatoin
! 
+Inf:ntAÄ1%>%^WCns             #   ; ! panna
+Inf:nOÖ1mAÄ1  SG-ILL_V  ; ! sanomaa
! +V+Inf+Ine:olemaas      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Ela:olemast      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Abe:olemata      #   ;
+Ger:nnees		#   ;
+Der/miin:nOÖ1%>mi N-inmihiin ;


LEXICON V-sannoa
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:o%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! oon
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:o%>%^WCnst	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:no%>%^LVws	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:o%>%^WCnsmmAÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:o%>%^WCnsttAÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:no%>%^LVwst	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+4:o%>%^WCnstaa	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:o%>%^WCns	#   ;

+V:oi IndPrt ;
+V:noi IndPrt ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:o%>%^WCnsin       #   ; ! oon
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:o%>%^WCnsit       #   ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:oi        K_V   ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:o%>%^WCnsimma     #   ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:o%>%^WCnsitta     #   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:oivAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:o%>tii     K_V   ;
+V+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:o%>%^WCnsttUY1         A-kova   ;

+V:non PotPers ; ! sanonnoo
!+V+Pot+4:ollaa      #   ;
!+V+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

! +V+Cond+Sg1:olisin      #   ; ! oon
! +V+Cond+Sg2:olisit      #   ;
! +V+Cond+Sg3:olis      #   ;
! +V+Cond+Pl1:olisimma    #   ;
! +V+Cond+Pl2:olisitta    #   ;
! +V+Cond+Pl3:olisivat     #   ;
+V+Cond+4:ottAÄ1is      K_V   ;
! !+V+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
+V:no ImprtPers_k ;
! +V+Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
+V+Imprt+4:ottAÄ1kkOÖ1OÖ1     K_V   ;
! !+V+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
+V:no V-actor_jA ; !
+V:no V-ActPrsPrc ; ! sanova
+V:no V-ActPrtPrc_nt ; !sanont
! +V+Prc:oltava			       #   ;
+V+PrtPrc:o%>ttUY1	A-kova   ;
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:nomAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! sanomatoin
! 
+V+Inf:no%>%^LCnsAÄ1             #   ; ! sannoa
+V+Inf:nomAÄ1  SG-ILL_V  ; ! sanomaa
! +V+Inf+Ine:olemaas      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Ela:olemast      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Abe:olemata      #   ;
+V+Ger:nojees		#   ;
+V+Der/miin:no%>mi N-inmihiin ;

! reflexive
!painuttaissa:painuttai
LEXICON V-painuttaissa
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>AÄ1%>n	#   ; ! oon
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>AÄ1%>t	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:jAÄ1AÄ1	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>AÄ1%>mmAÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>AÄ1%>ttAÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:jAÄ1AÄ1t	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+4:%>ssAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>AÄ1	#   ;

+V: IndPrt ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>%^WCnsin       #   ; ! oon
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>%^WCnsit       #   ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:i        K_V   ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>%^WCnsi%>mmAÄ1     #   ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>%^WCnsi%>ttAÄ1     #   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>vAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>stii     #   ;
+V+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:e%>%^WCnsttUY1      #   ;
! Fix 2012-10-04

+V:AÄ1n PotPers ; ! painuttainnoo
!+V+Pot+4:ollaa      #   ;
!+V+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

+V+Cond+Sg1:%>jAÄ1isin      #   ; ! oon
+V+Cond+Sg2:%>jAÄ1isit      #   ;
+V+Cond+Sg3:%>jAÄ1is      #   ;
+V+Cond+Pl1:%>jAÄ1isimmAÄ1    #   ;
+V+Cond+Pl2:%>jAÄ1isittAÄ1    #   ;
! +V+Cond+Pl3:olisivat     #   ;
+V+Cond+4:%>stAÄ1is      #   ;
! !+V+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
! +V+Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
! +V+Imprt+Sg3:olkoo      #   ;
! +V+Imprt+Pl1:olkaa    #   ;
! +V+Imprt+Pl2:olkoot    #   ;
! !+V+Imprt+Pl3:olisivat     #   ; ! laa ovat
! +V+Imprt+4:oltakoo      #   ;
! !+V+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
+V: V-actor_jA ; !
! +V+Prc:oleva			       #   ;!V-ActPrsPrc
+V:s V-ActPrtPrc_st ; !painuttast
+V+Prc:e%>ttAÄ1%>vAÄ1	A-tulova   ;
! +V+Prc:oltu			       #   ;
! 
+V+Inf:ssAÄ1             #   ; ! painuttaissa
+V+Inf:mAÄ1  SG-ILL_V   ; ! pittämää
! +V+Inf+Ine:olemaas      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Ela:olemast      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Abe:olemata      #   ;
! +V+Ger:ollees		#   ;
+V+Der/miin:mi N-inmihiin ; !

! pittiissä:pittii
LEXICON V-pittiissä
+V: V-pittiissä_01 ;
