src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
sannoa:sa V-sannoa  "" ;
painuttaissa:painuttai V-painuttaissa  "" ;
aloittaissa:aloittai V-painuttaissa  "" ;
eroittaissa:eroittai V-painuttaissa  "" ;
gruppiruissa:gruppirui V-painuttaissa  "" ;
erittäissä:erittäi V-painuttaissa  "" ;
pittiissä:pittii V-pittiissä  "" ;
suittiissa:suittii V-pittiissä  "" ;
sööttiissä:sööttii V-pittiissä  "" ;
näyttiissä:näyttii V-pittiissä  "" ;
vaihtiissa:vaihtii V-pittiissä  "" ;
panna:pa V-panna  "" ;
männä:mä V-panna  "" ;
